Massachusetts, session 194th, H714.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a special task force to review and report on the fiscal,
economic, and educational impact of raising the foundation budget inflation cap. The report shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) the consequences of the current inflation cap on school districts,
(ii) which school districts are most negatively impacted by the 4.5% cap, (iii) layoffs or budget
cuts that have occurred as a result of the cap, and (iv) the total financial impact to the
Commonwealth of raising the cap to different levels.
SECTION 2. The task force shall consist of: the commissioner of elementary and
secondary education, or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the chairs of the joint committee on
education, or their designees; the secretary of administration and finance, or a designee; the
president of the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents; the executive director of
the Massachusetts Association of Regional Schools; 1 member appointed by the president of the
senate; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 1 member appointed by the
of 2

speaker of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the house
of representatives; and 6 members appointed by the governor, 3 of whom shall be
superintendents of public school districts.
SECTION 3. No later than one year after enactment, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings to the house and senate clerks, house and senate committees on ways and means,
and the joint committee on education.
of 2